California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(a) The board shall establish the position of the Taxpayers’ Rights Advocate. The advocate or his or her designee shall be responsible for facilitating resolution of taxpayer complaints and problems, including any taxpayer complaints regarding unsatisfactory treatment of taxpayers by board employees, and staying actions where taxpayers have suffered or will suffer irreparable loss as the result of those actions. Applicable statutes of limitation shall be tolled during the pendency of a stay. Any penalties and interest that would otherwise
 accrue shall not be affected by the granting of a stay.

(b) The advocate shall report directly to the executive officer of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 438, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

43513.

(a) The board shall develop and implement an education and information program directed at, but not limited to, all of the following groups:

(1) Taxpayers newly registered with the board.

(2) Board audit and compliance staff.

(b) The education and information program shall include all of the following:

(1) A program of written communication with newly registered taxpayers explaining in simplified terms their duties and responsibilities.

(2) Participation in seminars and similar programs organized by federal, state, and local agencies.

(3) Revision of taxpayer educational materials currently produced by the board that explain the most common areas of taxpayer nonconformance in simplified terms.

(4) Implementation of a continuing education program for audit and compliance personnel to include the application of new legislation to taxpayer activities and areas of recurrent taxpayer noncompliance of inconsistency of administration.

(c) Electronic media used pursuant to this section shall not
 represent the voice, picture, or name of members of the board or of the Controller.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 929, Sec. 48.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

43514.

The board shall conduct an annual hearing before the full board where industry representatives and individual taxpayers are allowed to present their proposals on changes to the Hazardous Substances Tax Law which may further improve voluntary compliance and the relationship between taxpayers and government.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 438, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

43515.

The board shall prepare and publish brief but comprehensive statements in simple and nontechnical language that explain procedure, remedies, and the rights and obligations of the board and taxpayers. As appropriate, statements shall be provided to taxpayers with the initial notice of audit, the notice of proposed additional taxes, any subsequent notice of tax due, or other substantive notices. Additionally, the board shall include this language for statements in the annual tax information bulletins that are mailed to taxpayers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 438, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

43516.

(a) The total amount of revenue collected or assessed pursuant to this part shall not be used for any of the following:

(1) To evaluate individual officers or employees.

(2) To impose or suggest production quotas or goals, other than quotas or goals with respect to accounts receivable.

(b) The board shall certify in its annual report submitted
 pursuant to Section 15616 of the Government Code that revenue collected or assessed is not used in a manner prohibited by subdivision (a).

(c) Nothing in this section shall prohibit the setting of goals and the evaluation of performance with respect to productivity and the efficient use of time.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 438, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

43517.

The board shall develop and implement a program that will evaluate an individual employee’s or officer’s performance with respect to his or her contact with taxpayers. The development and implementation of the program shall be coordinated with the Taxpayers’ Rights Advocate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 438, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

43518.

The board shall, in cooperation with the Toxic Substances Control Department of the California EPA, the Taxpayers’ Rights Advocate, and other interested taxpayer-oriented groups, develop a plan to reduce the time required to resolve petitions for redetermination and claims for refunds. The plan shall include determination of standard timeframes and special review of cases which take more time than the appropriate standard timeframe.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 438, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

43519.

Procedures of the board, relating to appeals staff review conferences before a staff attorney or supervising tax auditor independent of the assessing department, shall include all of the following:

(a) Any conference shall be held at a reasonable time at a board office that is convenient to the taxpayer.

(b) The conference may be recorded only if prior notice is given to the taxpayer and the taxpayer is entitled to receive a copy of
 the recording.

(c) The taxpayer shall be informed prior to any conference that he or she has a right to have present at the conference his or her attorney, accountant, or other designated agent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 438, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

43520.

(a) Every taxpayer is entitled to be reimbursed for any reasonable fees and expenses related to a hearing before the board if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The taxpayer files a claim for the fees and expenses with the board within one year of the date the decision of the board becomes final.

(2) The board, in its sole discretion, finds that the action taken by the board staff was
 unreasonable.

(3) The board decides that the taxpayer be awarded a specific amount of fees and expenses related to the hearing, in an amount determined by the board in its sole discretion.

(b) To determine whether the board staff has been unreasonable, the board shall consider whether the board staff has established that its position was substantially justified.

(c) The amount of reimbursed fees and expenses shall be limited to the following:

(1) Fees and expenses incurred after the date of the notice of determination, jeopardy determination, or a claim for refund.

(2) If the board finds that the staff was unreasonable with respect to certain issues but reasonable with respect to other
 issues, the amount of reimbursed fees and expenses shall be limited to those that relate to the issues where the staff was unreasonable.

(d) Any proposed award by the board pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be available as a public record for at least 10 days prior to the effective date of the award.

(e) The amendments to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall be operative for claims filed on or after January 1, 2000.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1052, Sec. 63.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

43521.

(a) An officer or employee of the board acting in connection with any law administered by the board shall not knowingly authorize, require, or conduct any investigation of, or surveillance over, any person for nontax administration related purposes.

(b) Any person violating subdivision (a) shall be subject to disciplinary action in accordance with the State Civil Service Act, including dismissal from office or discharge from employment.

(c) This section shall not apply with respect to any otherwise lawful investigation concerning organized crime activities.

(d) The provisions of this section are not intended to prohibit, restrict, or prevent the exchange of information where the person is being investigated for multiple violations which include hazardous substances tax violations.

(e) For the purposes of this section:

(1) “Investigation” means any oral or written inquiry directed to any person, organization, or governmental agency.

(2) “Surveillance” means the monitoring of persons, places, or events by means of electronic interception, overt or covert observations, or photography, and the use of
 informants.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 438, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

43522.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration, its staff, and the Attorney General pursue settlements as authorized under this section with respect to civil tax matters in dispute, which arise under Section 105190 or 105310 of the Health and Safety Code, that are the subject of protests, appeals, or refund claims, consistent with a reasonable evaluation of the costs and risks associated with litigation of these matters.

(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), no recommendation of settlement shall be submitted to the
 director for approval unless and until that recommendation has been submitted by the chief counsel to the Attorney General. Within 30 days of receiving that recommendation, the Attorney General shall review the recommendation and advise the chief counsel, in writing, of their conclusions as to whether the recommendation is reasonable from an overall perspective. The
 chief counsel shall, with each recommendation of settlement submitted to the director, also submit the Attorney General’s written conclusions obtained pursuant to this paragraph.

(2) (A) A settlement of any civil tax matter in dispute involving a reduction of tax or penalties in settlement, the total of which reduction of tax and penalties in settlement does not exceed eleven thousand five hundred dollars ($11,500), may be approved by the director.

(B) Beginning on July 1, 2029, and each fifth fiscal year thereafter, the department shall adjust the amount specified in subparagraph (A) by increasing that amount by a percentage amount equal to the increase in the California Consumer Price Index, as calculated by the Department of Finance,
 with the resulting amount rounded to the nearest one hundred dollars ($100). The first adjustment pursuant to this subparagraph shall be a percentage amount equal to the increase in the California Consumer Price Index from January 1, 2024, to January 1, 2029. Subsequent fifth fiscal year adjustments shall cover subsequent five-year periods. The incremental change shall be added to the previously adjusted amount.

(c) Whenever a reduction of tax, or penalties, or total tax and penalties in settlement in excess of five hundred dollars ($500) is approved pursuant to this section, there shall be placed on file, for at least one year, in the office of the director of the
 California Department of Tax and Fee Administration a public record with respect to that settlement. The public record shall include all of the following information:

(1) The name or names of the taxpayers who are parties to the settlement.

(2) The total amount in dispute.

(3) The amount agreed to pursuant to the settlement.

(4) A summary of the reasons why the settlement is in the best interests of the State of California.

(5) (A) For any settlement approved by the
 director, except those settlements approved pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), the Attorney General’s conclusion as to whether the recommendation of settlement was reasonable from an overall perspective.

(B) The public record shall not include any information that relates to any trade secret, patent, process, style of work, apparatus, business secret, or organizational structure that, if disclosed, would adversely affect the taxpayer or the national defense.

(d) The director
 shall not participate in the settlement of tax matters pursuant to this section, except as provided in subdivision (e).

(e) (1) Any recommendation for settlement shall be approved or disapproved by the director within 45 days of the submission of that recommendation to the director. Any recommendation for settlement that is not either approved or disapproved by the director within 45 days of the submission of that recommendation shall be deemed approved.

(2) Where the director disapproves a recommendation for settlement, at the discretion of the director and chief counsel, the matter shall be remanded to staff for further negotiation, and may be resubmitted to the director, in the same manner and subject to the same requirements
 as the initial
 submission.

(f) All settlements entered into pursuant to this section shall be final and nonappealable, except upon a showing of fraud or misrepresentation with respect to a material fact.

(g) Except as provided in subdivision (c), any settlement considered or entered into pursuant to this section shall constitute confidential tax information for purposes of Section 43651.

(h) The Legislature finds that it is essential for fiscal purposes that the settlement program authorized by this section be expeditiously implemented. Accordingly, Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code shall not apply to any determination, rule, notice, or
 guideline established or issued by the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration in implementing and administering the settlement program authorized by this section.

(i) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall apply to any settlements approved on or after January 1, 2024.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 511, Sec. 28.   (SB 889)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

43522.5.

(a) (1) Beginning on January 1, 2007, the executive director and chief counsel of the board, or their delegates, may compromise any final tax liability where the reduction of tax is seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500) or less.

(2) Except as provided in paragraph (3), the board,
 upon recommendation by its executive director and chief counsel, jointly, may compromise a final tax liability involving a reduction in tax in excess of seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500). Any recommendation for approval of an offer in compromise that is not either approved or disapproved within 45 days of the submission of the recommendation shall be deemed approved.

(3) The board, itself, may by resolution delegate to the executive director and the chief counsel, jointly, the authority to compromise a final tax liability in which the reduction of tax is in excess of seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500), but less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(b) For purposes of this section, “a final tax liability” means any final tax liability arising under Part 22 (commencing with Section 43001), or related interest, additions to tax, penalties, or other amounts
 assessed under this part.

(c) Offers in compromise shall be considered only for liabilities that were generated from a business that has been discontinued or transferred, where the taxpayer making the offer no longer has a controlling interest or association with the transferred business or has a controlling interest or association with a similar type of business as the transferred or discontinued business.

(d) Offers in compromise shall not be considered where the taxpayer has been convicted of felony tax evasion under this part during the liability period.

(e) For amounts to be compromised under this section, the following conditions shall exist:

(1) The taxpayer shall establish that:

(A) The amount offered in payment is the most that can be expected to be paid or collected from the taxpayer’s present assets or income.

(B) The taxpayer does not have reasonable prospects of acquiring increased income or assets that would enable the taxpayer to satisfy a greater amount of the liability than the amount offered, within a reasonable period of time.

(2) The board shall have determined that acceptance of the compromise is in the best interest of the state.

(f) A determination by the board that it would not be in the best interest of the state to accept an offer in compromise in satisfaction of a final tax liability shall not be subject to administrative appeal or judicial review.

(g) (1) Offers for
 liabilities with a fraud or evasion penalty shall require a minimum offer of the unpaid tax and fraud or evasion penalty.

(2) The minimum offer may be waived if it can be shown that the taxpayer making the offer was not the person responsible for perpetrating the fraud or evasion. This authorization to waive only applies to partnership accounts where the intent to commit fraud or evasion can be clearly attributed to a partner of the taxpayer.

(h) When an offer in compromise is either accepted or rejected, or the terms and conditions of a compromise agreement are fulfilled, the board shall notify the taxpayer in writing. In the event an offer is rejected, the amount posted will either be applied to the liability or refunded, at the discretion of the taxpayer.

(i) When more than one taxpayer is liable for the debt,
 such as with spouses or partnerships or other business combinations, including, but not limited to, taxpayers who are liable through dual determination or successor’s liability, the acceptance of an offer in compromise from one liable taxpayer shall reduce the amount of the liability of the other taxpayers by the amount of the accepted offer.

(j) Whenever a compromise of tax or penalties or total tax and penalties in excess of five hundred dollars ($500) is approved, there shall be placed on file for at least one year in the office of the executive director of the board a public record with respect to that compromise. The public record shall include all of the following information:

(1) The name of the taxpayer.

(2) The amount of unpaid tax and related penalties, additions to tax, interest, or other amounts
 involved.

(3) The amount offered.

(4) A summary of the reason why the compromise is in the best interest of the state.

The public record shall not include any information that relates to any trade secrets, patent, process, style of work, apparatus, business secret, or organizational structure, that if disclosed, would adversely affect the taxpayer or violate the confidentiality provisions of Section 43651. No list shall be prepared and no releases distributed by the board in connection with these statements.

(k) Any compromise made under this section may be rescinded, all compromised liabilities may be reestablished, without regard to any statute of limitations that otherwise may be applicable, and no portion of the amount offered in compromise refunded, if either of the
 following occurs:

(1) The board determines that any person did any of the following acts regarding the making of the offer:

(A) Concealed from the board any property belonging to the estate of any taxpayer or other person liable for the tax.

(B) Received, withheld, destroyed, mutilated, or falsified any book, document, or record or made any false statement, relating to the estate or financial condition of the taxpayer or other person liable for the tax.

(2) The taxpayer fails to comply with any of the terms and conditions relative to the offer.

(l) Any person who, in connection with any offer or compromise under this section, or offer of that compromise to enter into that agreement,
 willfully does either of the following shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, shall be fined not more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) or imprisoned pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or both, together with the costs of investigation and prosecution:

(1) Conceals from any officer or employee of this state any property belonging to the estate of a taxpayer or other person liable in respect of the tax.

(2) Receives, withholds, destroys, mutilates, or falsifies any book, document, or record, or makes any false statement, relating to the estate or financial condition of the taxpayer or other person liable in respect of the tax.

(m) For purposes of this section, “person” means the taxpayer, any member of the taxpayer’s family, any corporation, agent, fiduciary, or representative
 of, or any other individual or entity acting on behalf of, the taxpayer, or any other corporation or entity owned or controlled by the taxpayer, directly or indirectly, or that owns or controls the taxpayer, directly or indirectly.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 583.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

43523.

(a) The California Department of Tax and Fee Administration shall release any levy or notice to withhold issued pursuant to this part on any property in the event that the expense of the sale process exceeds the liability for which the levy is made.

(b) (1) (A) The Taxpayers’ Rights Advocate may order the
 release of any levy or notice to withhold issued pursuant to this part or, within 90 days from the receipt of funds pursuant to a levy or notice to withhold, order the return of any amount up to two thousand three hundred dollars ($2,300) of moneys received, upon his or her finding that the levy or notice to withhold threatens the health or welfare of the taxpayer or his or her spouse and dependents or family.

(B) The amount the Taxpayers’ Rights Advocate may return to each taxpayer subject to a levy or notice to withhold, is limited to two thousand three hundred dollars ($2,300), or the adjusted amount as specified in paragraph (2), in any monthly period.

(C) The Taxpayers’ Rights Advocate may order amounts returned in the case of a seizure of property as a result of a jeopardy determination, subject to the amounts set or adjusted pursuant to this section and if the ultimate
 collection of the amount due is no longer in jeopardy.

(2) (A) The California Department of Tax and Fee Administration shall adjust the two-thousand-three-hundred-dollar ($2,300) amount specified in paragraph (1) as follows:

(i) On or before March 1, 2016, and on or before March 1 each year thereafter, the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration shall multiply the amount applicable for the current fiscal year by the inflation factor adjustment calculated based on the percentage change in the Consumer Price Index, as recorded by the California Department of Industrial Relations for the most recent year available, and the formula set forth in paragraph (2) of subdivision (h) of Section 17041. The resulting amount will be the applicable amount for the succeeding fiscal year only when the applicable amount computed is equal to or exceeds a new
 operative threshold, as defined in subparagraph (B).

(ii) When the applicable amount equals or exceeds an operative threshold specified in subparagraph (B), the resulting applicable amount, rounded to the nearest multiple of one hundred dollars ($100), shall be operative for purposes of paragraph (1) beginning July 1 of the succeeding fiscal year.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph, “operative threshold” means an amount that exceeds by at least one hundred dollars ($100) the greater of either the amount specified in paragraph (1) or the amount computed pursuant to subparagraph (A) as the operative adjustment to the amount specified in paragraph (1).

(c) The California Department of Tax and Fee Administration shall not sell any seized property until it has first notified the taxpayer in writing of the exemptions from
 levy under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 703.010) of Division 2 of Title 9 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(d) Except as provided in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), this section shall not apply to the seizure of any property as a result of a jeopardy determination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 181, Sec. 7.   (SB 1507)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

43523.5.

(a) Except in any case where the board finds collection of the tax to be in jeopardy, if any property has been levied upon, the property or the proceeds from the sale of the property shall be returned to the taxpayer if the board determines any one of the following:

(1) The levy on the property was not in accordance with the law.

(2) The taxpayer has entered into and is in compliance with an installment
 payment agreement pursuant to Section 43448 to satisfy the tax liability for which the levy was imposed, unless that or another agreement allows for the levy.

(3) The return of the property will facilitate the collection of the tax liability or will be in the best interest of the state and the taxpayer.

(b) Property returned under paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) is subject to the provisions of Section 43525.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 929, Sec. 50.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

43524.

Exemptions from levy under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 703.010) of Division 2 of Title 9 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure shall be adjusted for purposes of enforcing the collection of debts under this part to reflect changes in the California Consumer Price Index whenever the change is more than 5 percent higher than any previous adjustment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 589, Sec. 169.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

43525.

(a) A taxpayer may file a claim with the board for reimbursement of bank charges and any other reasonable third-party check charge fees incurred by the taxpayer as the direct result of an erroneous levy or notice to withhold, erroneous processing action, or erroneous collection action by the board. Bank and third-party charges include a financial institution’s or third party’s customary charge for
 complying with the levy or notice to withhold instructions and reasonable charges for overdrafts that are a direct consequence of the erroneous levy or notice to withhold, erroneous processing action, or erroneous collection action. The charges are those paid by the taxpayer and not waived or reimbursed by the financial institution or third party. Each claimant applying for reimbursement shall file a claim with the board that shall be in a form as may be prescribed by the board. In order for the board to grant a claim, the board shall determine that both of the following conditions have been satisfied:

(1) The erroneous levy or notice to withhold, erroneous processing action, or erroneous collection action was caused by board error.

(2) Prior to the erroneous levy or notice to withhold, erroneous processing action, or erroneous collection action, the taxpayer responded to all
 contacts by the board and provided the board with any requested information or documentation sufficient to establish the taxpayer’s position. This provision may be waived by the board for reasonable cause.

(b) Claims pursuant to this section shall be filed within 90 days from the date the bank and third-party charges were incurred by the taxpayer. Within 30 days from the date the claim is received, the board shall respond to the claim. If the board denies the claim, the taxpayer shall be notified in writing of the reason or reasons for the denial of the claim.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 253, Sec. 7.   (SB 442)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

43526.

(a) At least 30 days prior to the filing or recording of liens under Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 7150) or Chapter 14.5 (commencing with Section 7220) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration shall mail to the taxpayer a preliminary notice. The notice shall specify the statutory authority of the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration for filing or recording the lien, indicate the earliest date on which the lien may be filed or recorded, and state the remedies available to the taxpayer to prevent the filing or recording of the lien. In the event tax liens are filed for the same liability in multiple counties, only one preliminary notice shall be sent.

(b) The preliminary notice required by this section shall not apply to jeopardy determinations issued under Article 5 (commencing with Section 43350) of Chapter 3.

(c) If the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration determines that filing a lien was in error, it shall mail a release to the taxpayer and the entity recording the lien as soon as possible, but no later than seven days, after this determination and receipt of lien recording information. The release shall contain a statement that the lien was filed in error. In the event the erroneous lien is obstructing a lawful transaction, the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration shall immediately issue a release of lien to the taxpayer and the entity recording the lien.

(d) When the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration releases a lien
 erroneously filed, notice of that fact shall be mailed to the taxpayer and, upon the request of the taxpayer, a copy of the release shall be mailed to the major credit reporting companies in the county where the lien was filed.

(e) (1) The California Department of Tax and Fee Administration may release or subordinate a lien if the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration determines any of the following:

(A) Release or subordination will facilitate the collection of the tax liability.

(B) Release or subordination will be in the best interest of the state and the taxpayer.

(C) Release or subordination will be in the best interest of the state and another person that is not the taxpayer but that holds an interest with the
 taxpayer in the property that is subject to the lien.

(2) The amendments added to this subdivision do not constitute a change in, and are declaratory of, existing law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 73.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

43527.

(a) If any officer or employee of the board recklessly disregards board-published procedures, a taxpayer aggrieved by that action or omission may bring an action for damages against the State of California in superior court.

(b) In any action brought under subdivision (a), upon finding of liability on the part of the State of California, the state shall be liable to the plaintiff in an amount equal to the sum of all of the following:

(1) Actual and direct monetary damages sustained by the plaintiff as a result of the actions or omissions.

(2) Reasonable litigation costs including any of the following:

(A) Reasonable court costs.

(B) Prevailing market rates for the kind or quality of services furnished in connection with any of the following:

(i) The reasonable expenses of expert witnesses in connection with the civil proceedings, except that no expert witness shall be compensated at a rate in excess of the highest rate of compensation for expert witnesses paid by the State of California.

(ii) The reasonable cost of any study, analysis, engineering report,
 test, or project that is found by the court to be necessary for the preparation of the party’s case.

(iii) Reasonable fees paid or incurred for the services of attorneys in connection with the civil proceeding, except that those fees shall not be in excess of seventy-five dollars ($75) per hour unless the court determines that an increase in the cost of living or a special factor, such as the limited availability of qualified attorneys for the proceeding, justifies a higher rate.

(c) In the awarding of damages under subdivision (b), the court shall take into consideration the negligence or omissions, if any, on the part of the plaintiff which contributed to the damages.

(d) Whenever it appears to the court that the taxpayer’s position in the proceeding brought under subdivision (a) is frivolous, the court may impose
 a penalty against the plaintiff in an amount not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000). A penalty so imposed shall be paid upon notice and demand from the board and shall be collected as a tax imposed under this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 438, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Disposition of Proceeds [43551. - 43555.]

43551.

All taxes, interest, and penalties imposed and all amounts of tax required to be paid to the state pursuant to Sections 43051, 43053, and 43055, shall be paid to the board in the form of remittances payable to the State Board of Equalization of the State of California. The board shall transmit the payments to the Treasurer to be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the Hazardous Waste Control Account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 882, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

43552.

All taxes, interest, and penalties imposed and all amounts of tax required to be paid to the state pursuant to Section 43054 shall be paid to the board in the form of remittances payable to the State Board of Equalization of the State of California. The board shall transmit the payments to the Treasurer for deposit in the State Treasury to the credit of the Toxic Substances Control Account.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 882, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

43553.

All taxes, interest, and penalties imposed on all amounts of tax required to be paid to the state pursuant to Section 43056 shall be paid to the board in the form of remittances payable to the State Board of Equalization. The board shall transmit the payments to the Treasurer to be deposited into the State Treasury to the credit of the Occupational Lead Poisoning Prevention Account.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 798, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

43554.

All fees, interest, and penalties imposed and all amounts of fees required to be paid to the state pursuant to Section 43057 shall be paid to the board in the form of remittances payable to the Board of Equalization of the State of California. The board shall transmit the payments to the Treasurer to be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the Childhood Lead Poisoning Prevention Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 799, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

43555.

Notwithstanding Section 43551, all amounts required to be paid to the state pursuant to Section 43051, 43053, 43054, and 43055 by the United States and its agencies and instrumentalities shall be paid to the board in the form of remittances payable to the State Board of Equalization of the State of California. The board shall transmit the payment to the Treasurer to be deposited into the State Treasury to the credit of the Federal Receipts Account, created pursuant to Section 25174.8 of the Health and Safety Code, and which may be expended by the department,
 upon appropriation by the Legislature, for those administrative purposes allowed by federal law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1223, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Violations [43602. - 43607.]

43602.

Any person who refuses to furnish any return or report required to be made, or who refuses to furnish a supplemental return or other data required by the board, is guilty of a misdemeanor and subject to a fine in an amount not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) for each offense.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 496, Sec. 43.   Effective July 12, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

43603.

Any person who knowingly or willfully files a false tax return with the board, and any person who refuses to permit the board or any of its representatives to make any inspection or examination for which provision is made in this part, or who fails to keep records as prescribed by the board, or who fails to preserve such records for the inspection of the board for such time as the board deems necessary, or who alters, cancels, or obliterates entries in such records for the purpose of falsifying the records is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one
 thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment in the county jail for not less than one month nor more than six months, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 756, Sec. 3.   Effective September 25, 1981.)
-------------------------------------------

43604.

Any person who willfully evades or attempts in any manner to evade or defeat the payment of the tax imposed by this part is guilty of a felony.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 756, Sec. 3.   Effective September 25, 1981.)
-------------------------------------------

43605.

Every person convicted for a violation of any of the provisions of this part for which another penalty or punishment is not specifically provided for in this part is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500) or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six months, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 756, Sec. 3.   Effective September 25, 1981.)
-------------------------------------------

43606.

Every person convicted of a felony for a violation of any of the provisions of this part for which another punishment is not specifically provided for in this part shall be punished by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 584.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

43607.

Any prosecution for violation of any of the penal provisions of this part shall be instituted within three years after the commission of the offense.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 756, Sec. 3.   Effective September 25, 1981.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Disclosure of Information [43651. - 43651.]

43651.

(a) The California Department of Tax and Fee Administration shall provide to the State Department of Public Health or the Department of Toxic Substances Control any and all information obtained under this part relating to the
 fee collected for that agency.

(b) The Department of Toxic Substances Control and the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration may utilize any information obtained pursuant to this part to develop data on the generation or disposal of hazardous or extremely hazardous waste within the state. Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the Department of Toxic Substances Control may make waste generation and disposal data available to the public.

(c) It shall be unlawful for the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration, the State Department of Public Health, the Department of Toxic Substances Control, or any person having an administrative duty under this part to make known, in any manner whatever, the name, business affairs, operations,
 or any other information pertaining to a taxpayer